New York, session 2025-2026, S10115.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 65 of the public service law, as 2 amended by chapter 789 of the laws of 1930, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Every gas corporation, every electric corporation and every munici- 5 pality shall furnish and provide such service, instrumentalities and 6 facilities as shall be safe and adequate and in all respects just and 7 reasonable. All charges made or demanded by any such gas corporation, 8 electric corporation or municipality on the monthly utility bill for 9 gas, electricity or any service rendered or to be rendered, shall be 10 just and reasonable and not more than allowed by law or by order of the 11 commission, notwithstanding the foregoing the utility bill annually 12 shall not increase by more than three percent as measured on an annual 13 basis unless a gas corporation, electric corporation or a municipality 14 including the Long Island power authority service provider demonstrates 15 that an increase is necessary to maintain the reliability and safety of 16 the grid. Every unjust or unreasonable charge made or demanded for gas, 17 electricity or any such service, or in connection therewith, or in 18 excess of that allowed by law or by the order of the commission is 19 prohibited. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15534-01-6